Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF2310.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 6115XS (3) 91 ak/ko S.F. 2310 Section 1. Section 239.6, subsection 1, paragraph a, 1 subparagraph (4), Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 2 (4) Information maintained by the United States citizenship 3 and immigration services of the United States department of 4 homeland security , including information accessible through the 5 systematic alien verification for entitlements online service . 6 Sec. 2. Section 239.6, subsection 2, Code 2026, is amended 7 by adding the following new paragraph: 8 NEW PARAGRAPH . g. The systematic alien verification for 9 entitlements online service maintained by the United States 10 citizenship and immigration services of the United States 11 department of homeland security to verify immigration and 12 United States citizenship information. 13